New York, session 2025-2026, S8477.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alco- 2 holic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 463 of the laws of 3 2009, is amended to read as follows: 4 (a) on the same street or avenue and within two hundred feet of a 5 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 6 place of worship; provided, however, that the authority may issue a 7 retail license for on-premises consumption for a premises, not located 8 within a city with a population of one million or more, which shall be 9 within two hundred feet of a building occupied exclusively as a school, 10 church, synagogue, or other place of worship if the owner or administra- 11 tor of such school, church, or other place of worship affirmatively 12 provides support for the issuance of such license; or 13 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 7 of section 14 64-a of the alcoholic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 463 of 15 the laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 16 (i) on the same street or avenue and within two hundred feet of a 17 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 18 place of worship; provided, however, that the authority may issue a 19 special license for on-premises consumption for a premises, not located 20 within a city with a population of one million or more, which shall be 21 within two hundred feet of a building occupied exclusively as a school, 22 church, synagogue, or other place of worship if the owner or administra- 23 tor of such school, church, or other place of worship affirmatively 24 provides support for the issuance of such license; or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13632-01-5 S. 8477 2 1 § 3. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 2 64-b of the alcoholic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 463 of 3 the laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) on the same street or avenue and within two hundred feet of a 5 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 6 place of worship; provided, however, that the authority may issue a 7 bottle club license for on-premises consumption for a premises, not 8 located within a city with a population of one million or more, which 9 shall be within two hundred feet of a building occupied exclusively as a 10 school, church, synagogue, or other place of worship if the owner or 11 administrator of such school, church, or other place of worship affir- 12 matively provides support for the issuance of such license; or 13 § 4. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 11 of section 14 64-c of the alcoholic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 463 of 15 the laws of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 16 (i) on the same street or avenue and within two hundred feet of a 17 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 18 place of worship; provided, however, that the authority may issue a 19 restaurant-brewer license for on-premises consumption for a premises, 20 not located within a city with a population of one million or more, 21 which shall be within two hundred feet of a building occupied exclusive- 22 ly as a school, church, synagogue, or other place of worship if the 23 owner or administrator of such school, church, or other place of 24 worship affirmatively provides support for the issuance of such license; 25 or 26 § 5. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 8 of section 64-d of the alcoholic 27 beverage control law, as amended by chapter 463 of the laws of 2009, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 (a) on the same street or avenue and within two hundred feet of a 30 building occupied exclusively as a school, church, synagogue or other 31 place of worship; provided, however, that the authority may issue a 32 cabaret license for on-premises consumption for a premises, not located 33 within a city with a population of one million or more, which shall be 34 within two hundred feet of a building occupied exclusively as a school, 35 church, synagogue, or other place of worship if the owner or administra- 36 tor of such school, church, or other place of worship affirmatively 37 provides support for the issuance of such license; or 38 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.